Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,105
Reverter or rights of entry; sections; severability.

If any provision of sections 76-299 to 76-2,105 or the application of any provision thereto to any property, person, or circumstance is held to be invalid, such provision as to such property, person, or circumstance shall be deemed to be excised from sections 76-299 to 76-2,105, and the invalidity thereof as to such property, persons, or circumstances shall not affect any of the other provisions of sections 76-299 to 76-2,105 or the application of such provision to property, persons, or circumstances other than those as to which it is invalid, and sections 76-299 to 76-2,105 shall be applied and shall be effective in every situation so far as its constitutionality extends.

Laws 1959, c. 350, § 7, p. 1239.